Utah statutes.
20A-11-1503.   Criminal penalties -- Fines.

(1)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of a financial statement required by this part, the lieutenant governor shall review each filed financial statement to ensure that:

(a)  each labor organization that is required to file a financial statement has filed one; and

(b)  each financial statement contains the information required by this part.

(2)  If it appears that any labor organization has failed to file a financial statement, if it appears that a filed financial statement does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of a financial statement, the lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  impose a fine against the labor organization in accordance with Section 20A-11-1005; and

(b)  within five days of discovery of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the labor organization of the violation or written complaint and direct the labor organization to file a financial statement correcting the problem.

(3) (a)  It is unlawful for any labor organization to fail to file or amend a financial statement within seven days after receiving notice from the lieutenant governor under this section.

(b)  Each labor organization that violates Subsection (3)(a) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (3)(a) to the attorney general.

(d)  In addition to the criminal penalty described in Subsection (3)(b), the lieutenant governor shall impose a civil fine of $1,000 against a labor organization that violates Subsection (3)(a).



Amended by Chapter 420, 2013 General Session

